Tennessee, session 114, HB0174.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 49, Chapter 6, Part 23, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
An LEA shall publish the school lunch menu on the LEA's website.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0174
001715
- 1 -